Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 11

Real Property Interests Generally

Subchapter 1

— Ownership and Possession

Effective Dates.

Acts 1874, No. 16, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 2019, No. 496, § 3: Mar. 18, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is necessary to prevent claims of liability against parties that are exempt from liability as a matter of public policy of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

18-11-101. Capacity of aliens to take and transfer lands.

(a)

All aliens shall be capable of taking, by deed or will, lands and tenements in fee simple, or other less estate, and of holding, aliening, and devising them.

(b)

Upon the death of any alien having title by purchase or descent, according to this section, to any lands or tenements, the lands and tenements shall descend and pass as if the alien were a citizen of the United States.

(c)

It shall be no objection to the husband, widow, or kindred of an alien, or any citizen deceased, taking lands and tenements by virtue of the laws of this state regulating the distribution of estates of intestates, that they are aliens.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 7, § 1; Acts 1874, No. 16, § 1, p. 60; C. & M. Dig., § 258; Pope's Dig., § 272; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-301.

Cross References.

Possession, enjoyment, or descent of property, prohibition against distinction by law between resident aliens and citizens, Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 20.

18-11-102. Payment of taxes on unimproved or unenclosed land deemed possession.

Unimproved and unenclosed land shall be deemed and held to be in possession of the person who pays the taxes thereon if he or she has color of title thereto, but no person shall be entitled to invoke the benefit of this section unless he or she, and those under whom he or she claims, shall have paid the taxes for at least seven (7) years in succession.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 66, § 1, p. 117; C. & M. Dig., § 6943; Pope's Dig., § 8920; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-102.

18-11-103. Payment of taxes on wild and unimproved land — Presumption of color of title.

Payment of taxes on wild and unimproved land in this state by any person or his or her predecessor in title for a period of fifteen (15) consecutive years shall create a presumption of law that the person, or his or her predecessor in title, held color of title to the land prior to the first payment of taxes made as stated and that all the payments were made under color of title.

History.

Acts 1929, No. 199, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 8921, 13601; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-103.

18-11-104. Right of possession not impaired by descent cast.

The right of any person to the possession of any lands or tenements shall not be impaired or affected by a descent cast in consequence of the death of any person in possession of the estate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 91, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 6945; Pope's Dig., § 8923; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-105.

18-11-105. Surface rights of cotenants or tenants-in-common — Waiver.

(a)

All right or claim of right, title, interest, equity, and estate by a cotenant or tenant-in-common, including minors, to surface rights in real property, which the cotenant or tenant-in-common is not possessing, having been created by intestate descent and distribution or under the testate distribution of those surface rights by the cotenant or tenant-in-common's grantor, shall be conclusively deemed waived, abandoned, and forfeited to the other person or legal entity, holding title as cotenant, or tenant-in-common, and in possession, on the condition that:

(1)

The cotenant or tenant-in-common, not in possession, and whose whereabouts are unknown, has made no written demand upon the cotenant or tenant-in-common, in possession, for rents, profits, or possession of the surface rights for a twenty-year period; and

(2)(A)(i)

After the expiration of the twenty-year period, whether commencing before or after July 15, 1991, the cotenant or tenant-in-common, in possession, publishes notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the surface rights are located, of an intent to oust the cotenant or tenant-in-common, not in possession, from the lands described in the notice, as a result of the abandonment and waiver referred to in this subsection.

(ii)

The notice shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks.

(B)(i)

Not less than ninety (90) days nor more than three hundred sixty-five (365) days following the last date of publication referred to in this section, the cotenant or tenant-in-common, in possession, may maintain an action to quiet title in the county in which the surface rights are situated and located, with the rights or claim of right of the cotenant or tenant-in-common, not in possession, having been conclusively deemed waived, abandoned, and forfeited to the person or legal entity, holding as cotenant, or tenant-in-common, and in possession thereof.

(ii)

Upon successful prosecution of the action to quiet title, the cotenant, or tenant-in-common, in possession, shall hold the surface rights free and clear of any claim or title in the cotenant or tenant-in-common, including minors, not in possession.

(b)

The following form of notice shall be sufficient, for purposes of this section:

“ (Name) , the owner and possessor of the surface rights to the real property described below, do hereby state, affirm and give notice to any missing or absent claimants, whose whereabouts are unknown, to said real property of my intent to oust said missing or absent claimant, who has made no written claim for rents, profits or possession of said real property during the last twenty (20) years and intend to institute an action to quiet title to such real property. The real property referred to is described as follows: Subscribed and sworn to before me this
day of
,
. (Seal)”

Click to view form.

(c)

For purposes of the action to quiet title referred to in this section, an affidavit or other evidence denying the receipt of written demand referred to in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, above, and an affidavit or other evidence affirming the publication of notice of intent to oust referred to in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, shall be sufficient evidence to sustain the plaintiff's burden of proof in the action, with no other evidence necessary. It shall not be necessary that the notice or the action to quiet title name the missing or absent cotenant or tenant-in-common, not in possession, as those missing persons may be collectively referred to as “missing or absent claimants” to the lands described in the notice or action.

(d)(1)

This section shall not apply to mineral rights or other subsurface rights held by cotenants or tenants-in-common.

(2)

For purposes of this section, cotenants or tenants-in-common shall include joint tenants.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 660, §§ 1-3.

18-11-106. Adverse possession.

(a)

To establish adverse possession of real property, the person and those under whom the person claims must have actual or constructive possession of the real property being claimed and have either:

(1)(A)

Held color of title to the real property for a period of at least seven (7) years and during that time paid ad valorem taxes on the real property.

(B)

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(1), color of title may be established by the person claiming adversely to the true owner by paying the ad valorem taxes for a period of at least seven (7) years for unimproved and unenclosed land or fifteen (15) years for wild and unimproved land, provided the true owner has not also paid the ad valorem taxes or made a bona fide good faith effort to pay the ad valorem taxes which were misapplied by the state and local taxing authority; or

(2)

Held color of title to real property contiguous to the real property being claimed by adverse possession for a period of at least seven (7) years and during that time paid ad valorem taxes on the contiguous real property to which the person has color of title.

(b)(1)

The requirements of subsection (a) of this section with regard to payment of ad valorem taxes shall not apply to a person or entity exempt from the payment of ad valorem taxes by law.

(2)

For the person or entity exempt from the payment of ad valorem taxes to establish adverse possession of real property, the person or entity must have:

(A)

Actual or constructive possession of the real property being claimed and held color of title to the real property for a period of at least seven (7) years; or

(B)

Actual or constructive possession of the real property being claimed and held color of title to the real property contiguous to the real property being claimed by adverse possession for a period of at least seven (7) years.

(c)

The requirements of this section are in addition to all other requirements for establishing adverse possession.

(d)(1)

This section shall not repeal any requirement under existing case law for establishing adverse possession but shall be supplemental to existing case law.

(2)

This section shall not diminish the presumption of possession of unimproved and unenclosed land created under §18-11-102 by payment of taxes for seven (7) years under color of title or the presumption of color of title on wild and unimproved land created under §18-11-103 by payment of taxes for fifteen (15) consecutive years.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 776, § 1; 2005, No. 84, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted present (b); and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

18-11-107. Required disclosure by closing agent — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Agricultural operation” means an agricultural, silvicultural, or aquacultural facility or pursuit conducted, in whole or in part, including:

(A)

The care and production of livestock and livestock products, poultry and poultry products, apiary products, and plant and animal production for nonfood uses;

(B)

The planting, cultivating, harvesting, and processing of crops and timber; and

(C)

The production of any plant or animal species in a controlled freshwater or saltwater environment; and

(2)

“Closing agent” means a person that facilitates a closing.

(b)

A closing agent shall provide a written disclosure statement before or at the time of closing a real estate transaction that makes a buyer of real property aware that:

(1)

The real property may be located within or near a rural area; and

(2)

Agricultural operations on real property nearby are protected under §2-4-101 et seq. and shall not be found to be a public or private nuisance if the agricultural operation employs methods or practices that are commonly or reasonably associated with agricultural production.

(c)

A cause of action shall not arise against and liability shall not be imposed upon a closing agent or a closing agent's employer due to a failure to provide a buyer of real property the written disclosure statement required under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 515, § 1.

18-11-108. Liability for criminal acts.

(a)

A criminal act committed on real property by a third party is not foreseeable in any circumstance by a person having an interest in the real property, including without limitation:

(1)

An owner;

(2)

A landlord;

(3)

A tenant; or

(4)

A lienholder.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person having an interest in real property shall not be liable to a licensee, invitee, trespasser, employee, agent, or any other person for the unforeseeable criminal acts of a third party committed on his or her real property.

(c)

This section does not:

(1)

Establish or repeal the doctrine of infra hospitium, which means in the care or custody of the innkeeper, or change the liability of an innkeeper or the operator of a public lodging; and

(2)

Expand or reduce the obligation or liabilities of an employer or principal for criminal acts committed under the doctrine of respondeat superior, which makes the principal liable to a third party for any loss caused by the principal's agent.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 496, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 496, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Owners of real property, landlords, tenants, or others having an interest in real property do not have a duty to protect an employee or tenant on the real property from the criminal acts of third parties as held by the Court of Appeals in Park Plaza Mall CMBS, LLC v. Powell, 2018 Ark. App. 48.;

“(2)

Criminal acts committed by third parties are not reasonably foreseeable; and

“(3)

The existing public policy of the State of Arkansas is that the owners of real property, landlords, tenants, or others having an interest in real property do not have a duty to protect or safeguard an employee or tenant against the criminal acts of third parties”.

Subchapter 2

— Property of Religious Societies

18-11-201. Trustees to hold in perpetual succession.

All lands and tenements, not exceeding forty (40) acres, that have been, or hereafter may be, conveyed by purchase to any person as trustee in trust for the use of any religious society within this state, either for a meeting house, burying ground, campground, or residence for their preacher, shall descend with the improvements and appurtenances in perpetual succession in trust to the trustee or trustees as shall, from time to time, be elected or appointed by any religious society, according to the rules and regulations of the society.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 125, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 8637; Pope's Dig., § 11368; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-201.

Cross References.

Rule against perpetuities inapplicable to trust funds for perpetual care of burial lots, §20-17-904.

18-11-202. Authority of trustees.

The trustee or trustees of any religious society shall have the same power to defend and prosecute suits at law or in equity and do all other acts for the protection, improvement, and preservation of trust property as individuals may do in relation to their individual property.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 125, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 8638; Pope's Dig., § 11369; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-202.

Parties.

Elders of church are proper parties to sue where church property is involved. Young v. Knox, 165 Ark. 129, 263 S.W. 52 (1924).

Subchapter 3

— Recreational Uses — Owner's Liability

18-11-301. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to encourage owners of land to make land and water areas available to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their liability toward persons entering thereon for such purposes.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1101.

18-11-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Aviation” means taking off, flying, or landing an airplane or aircraft;

(2)

“Charge” means an admission fee for permission to go upon or use the land, but does not include:

(A)

The sharing of game, fish, or other products of recreational use; or

(B)

Contributions in kind, services, or cash paid to reduce or offset costs and eliminate losses from recreational use;

(3)

“Land” means land, roads, water, watercourses, airstrips, private ways and buildings, structures, and machinery or equipment when attached to the realty;

(4)(A)

“Malicious” means an intentional act of misconduct that the actor is aware is likely to result in harm.

(B)

“Malicious” does not mean negligent or reckless conduct;

(5)

“Owner” means the possessor of a fee interest, a tenant, lessee, holder of a conservation easement as defined in §15-20-402, occupant, or person in control of the premises;

(6)

“Public” and “person” includes the Young Men's Christian Association, Young Women's Christian Association, Boy Scouts of America, Girl Scouts of the United States of America, Boys and Girls Clubs of America, churches, religious organizations, fraternal organizations, and other similar organizations; and

(7)

“Recreational purpose” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following or any combination thereof:

(A)

Hunting;

(B)

Fishing;

(C)

Swimming;

(D)

Boating;

(E)

Camping;

(F)

Picnicking;

(G)

Hiking;

(H)

Pleasure driving;

(I)

Nature study;

(J)

Water skiing;

(K)

Winter sports;

(L)

Spelunking;

(M)

Aviation;

(N)

Viewing or enjoying historical, archeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and

(O)

Any other activity undertaken for exercise, education, relaxation, or pleasure on land owned by another.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 2; 1983, No. 168, §§
1, 2; 1985, No. 959, §
1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1102; Acts 1991, No. 485, §
1; 2007, No. 677, §
1; 2013, No. 84, §
1; 2015, No. 1112, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 1112, § 2, provided: “Applicability.

“(a)

This act applies to all causes of action that accrue on or after the effective date of this act.

“(b)

This act does not apply retroactively to an action filed or a cause of action that accrued before the effective date of this act.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted (1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; inserted “airstrips” in present (3); and inserted present (6)(M) [now (7)(M)] and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2015 amendment added the definition for “Malicious”.

18-11-303. Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to:

(1)

Create a duty of care or ground of liability for injury to persons or property; or

(2)

Relieve any person using the land of another for recreational purposes from any obligation which he or she may have in the absence of this subchapter to exercise care in his or her use of the land and in his or her activities thereon or relieve any person from the legal consequences of failure to employ such care.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1107.

18-11-304. Duty of care.

Except as specifically recognized by or provided in §18-11-307, an owner of land owes no duty of care to keep the premises safe for entry or use by others for recreational purposes or to give any warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the premises to persons entering for recreational purposes.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1103.

18-11-305. Owner's immunity from liability.

Except as specifically recognized by or provided in §18-11-307, an owner of land who, either directly or indirectly, invites or permits without charge any person to use his or her property for recreational purposes does not thereby:

(1)

Extend any assurance that the lands or premises are safe for any purpose;

(2)

Confer upon the person the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed;

(3)

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or property caused by an act or omission of such persons; or

(4)

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for injury to the person or property caused by any natural or artificial condition, structure, or personal property on the land.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 4; 1983, No. 168, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1104.

18-11-306. Land leased to state or political subdivision — Conservation easement.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the provisions of §§18-11-304 and18-11-305 are applicable to the duties and liability of:

(1)

An owner of land leased to the state or a political subdivision of the state for recreational purposes;

(2)

An owner of an interest in the real property burdened by a conservation easement as defined in §15-20-402; or

(3)

A holder of a conservation easement as defined in §15-20-402.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1105; Acts 2007, No. 677, § 2.

18-11-307. Exceptions to owner's immunity.

Nothing in this subchapter limits in any way liability which otherwise exists:

(1)

For malicious, but not mere negligent, failure to guard or warn against an ultra-hazardous condition, structure, personal property, use, or activity actually known to the owner to be dangerous; and

(2)

For injury suffered in any case in which the owner of land charges the person or persons who enter or go on the land for the recreational use thereof, except that, in the case of land leased to the state, a subdivision thereof, or to a third person, any consideration received by the owner for the lease shall not be deemed a charge within the meaning of this section.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 51, § 6; 1983, No. 168, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1106.

Subchapter 4

— Posted Land

Publisher's Notes.

Former subchapter 4, concerning posted land, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 35, § 9. The former subchapter was derived from the following sources:

18-11-401. Acts 1985, No. 1090, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 41-2004n, 50-1102n — 50-1107n.

18-11-402. Acts 1985, No. 1090, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 41-2060.

18-11-403. Acts 1985, No. 1090, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 41-2062.

18-11-404. Acts 1985, No. 1090, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 41-2061.

18-11-405. Acts 1985, No. 1090, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 41-2063, 41-2064.

Cross References.

Trespass on posted lands, §5-39-301 et seq.

Unlawful to install or maintain booby traps, §5-73-126.

18-11-401. Purpose.

It is the intent and purpose of this subchapter to clarify the posting law of this state. However, this subchapter does not set forth the exclusive method by which a property owner or lessee may notify persons to not enter or remain upon their property, nor does this subchapter repeal or modify §18-11-301 et seq., which limits the liability of landowners to persons gratuitously utilizing their property for recreational purposes, nor does this subchapter repeal or modify §5-39-203 which is the provision of the Arkansas Criminal Code relating to trespass.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 35, § 7.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Criminal Code referred to in this section is codified throughout Title 5. See Publisher's Note to §5-1-101.

Cross References.

Criminal trespass, §5-39-203.

Recreational uses — owner's liability, §18-11-301 et seq.

18-11-402. Definition.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “recreational purposes” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following, or any combination thereof:

(1)

Hunting;

(2)

Fishing;

(3)

Trapping;

(4)

Swimming;

(5)

Boating;

(6)

Camping;

(7)

Picnicking;

(8)

Hiking;

(9)

Pleasure driving;

(10)

Nature study;

(11)

Water skiing;

(12)

Winter sports; and

(13)

Viewing or enjoying historical, archeological, scenic, or scientific sites.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 35, § 1.

18-11-403. Unlawful entry upon land — Penalty.

(a)(1)

No person shall enter for recreational purposes upon real property posted pursuant to this subchapter without written permission of the owner or lessee of the real property.

(2)

It shall be unlawful for any person to enter upon any real property posted under the provisions of this subchapter without the written consent of the owner or lessee of the real property.

(3)(A)

If land posted pursuant to this subchapter becomes flooded above the ordinary high watermark but the signs or paint marks are still visible, it is unlawful for any person to enter within the boundaries of the posted area without the written consent of the owner or lessee of the real property.

(B)

For purposes of subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section, “ordinary high watermark” means the line delimiting the bed of a stream from its bank, i.e., that line at which the presence of water is continued for such length of time as to mark upon the soil and vegetation a distinct character.

(4)

However, it shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution under this subchapter that:

(A)

Consent was given by a person holding himself or herself out to be the owner, lessee, or agent of the owner or lessee of the property;

(B)

The person was a guest or invitee;

(C)

The person was required to enter upon the premises for business reasons or for health or safety reasons; or

(D)

The person was authorized by law to enter upon land.

(b)

This section shall not apply to a law enforcement officer in the line of duty.

(c)

Any person who knowingly enters the real property without written consent shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 35, §§ 2, 6; 1997, No. 806, § 1; 1999, No. 1029, § 8.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added (a)(4)(B)-(a)(4)(D); inserted present (b); redesignated former (b) as present (c); and made stylistic and punctuation changes.

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

18-11-404. Methods of posting — Forest lands.

The owner or lessee of any forest land may post the land by any of the following methods:

(1)(A)

By placing signs around the boundaries of the property at points no more than one hundred feet (100') apart and at each point of entry.

(B)

The signs shall bear the words “posted” or “no trespassing”, or both, in letters at least four inches (4") high and shall be so placed as to be readily visible to any person approaching the property;

(2)(A)

By placing identifying paint marks on trees or posts around the area to be posted.

(B)

Each paint mark shall be a vertical line of at least eight inches (8") in length and the bottom of the mark shall be no less than three feet (3') nor more than five feet (5') high.

(C)

Such paint marks shall be placed no more than one hundred feet (100') apart and shall be readily visible to any person approaching the property.

(D)(i)

The type and color of the paint to be used for posting shall be prescribed by rule by the Arkansas Forestry Commission.

(ii)

The commission shall not select a color that is presently being used by the timber industry in Arkansas to mark land lines or property lines; or

(3)

By enclosing the property with a fence sufficient under §2-39-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 35, § 3; 1999, No. 1029, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 1683.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment substituted “any” for “either” in the introductory language; added (3); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (2)(D)(i).

18-11-405. Methods of posting — Property other than forest.

The owner or lessee of any real property other than forest land, including cultivated land, orchards, pasture land, impoundments, or other real property, may post such real property by any of the following methods:

(1)(A)

By placing signs around the boundaries of the property at points no more than one thousand feet (1,000') apart and at each point of entry.

(B)

The signs shall bear the words “posted” or “no trespassing”, or both, in letters at least four inches (4") high and shall be so placed as to be readily visible to any person approaching the property;

(2)(A)

By placing identifying paint marks on posts around the area to be posted.

(B)

Each paint mark shall be a vertical line of at least eight inches (8") in length, and the bottom of the mark shall be no less than three feet (3') nor more than five feet (5') high.

(C)

Such paint marks shall be placed no more than one thousand feet (1,000') apart and at each point of entry and shall be readily visible to any person approaching the property.

(D)(i)

The type and color of the paint to be used for posting shall be prescribed by rule by the Arkansas Forestry Commission.

(ii)

The commission shall not select a color that is presently being used by the timber industry in Arkansas to mark land lines or property lines; or

(3)

By enclosing the property with a fence sufficient under §2-39-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 35, § 3; 1999, No. 1029, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 1684.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment substituted “any” for “either” in the introductory language; substituted “boundaries” for “boundries” in (1); added (3); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (2)(D)(i).

18-11-406. Color of paint — Unlawful posting — Exception.

(a)(1)

The color of paint prescribed by the Arkansas Forestry Commission for posting purposes shall not be used on trees or posts for any other purpose.

(2)

Any person who knowingly paints such color on any tree or post for any purpose other than posting real property pursuant to this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

(b)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to post any lands which the person does not own or lease except with the written permission of the owner or lessee.

(2)

Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 35, §§ 4, 5; 2011, No. 271, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “Arkansas” for “State” in (a)(1).

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Subchapter 5

— Residential Restrictive Covenants

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 1380, § 7: Apr. 13, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that there is an immediate and urgent need for revision of the current state law concerning enforcement of interior setback restrictions in residential restrictive covenants. Recent court decisions appear to hold that any violation of such an interior setback restriction, no matter how slight, requires that the structure or part thereof built in violation of the setback restriction be removed. Such an interpretation of the law regarding interior setback restrictions in residential restrictive covenants will result in the needless destruction of property, with resultant displacement of homeowners and their families and substantial expenditures to correct setback restriction violations which, in actuality, cause little or no damage to adjacent land owners. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-11-501. Discretionary enforcement of residential restrictive covenants.

Circuit judges are authorized to exercise their discretion to balance the equities between or among parties when considering whether to award injunctions or damages in cases involving encroachment of interior setback lines in residential subdivision restrictive covenants.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1380, § 1.

18-11-502. Attorney's fees.

If the trial judge makes a finding that the violation of an interior setback restriction is de minimis, no attorney's fees shall be awarded to any party seeking to enforce the setback restriction.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1380, § 2.

18-11-503. Applicability of subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to cases currently pending in the courts of Arkansas as well as those filed subsequent to April 13, 1999.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1380, § 3.

Subchapter 6

— Municipal Water Supply Purposes — Owner's Immunity

Effective Dates.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 2: Apr. 11, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is nothing currently in the law that grants immunity from liability to persons who make property available for municipal water supply purposes; that this act provides sound public policy for the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because the state should encourage property owners to make property available for municipal water supply purposes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-11-601. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to encourage owners of land to make land and water areas available to municipal governments for municipal water supply purposes by limiting the liability of landowners toward persons entering on the land and water areas.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.

18-11-602. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Land” means real property, roads, water, watercourses, private ways, and buildings, structures, and machinery or equipment when attached to the real property;

(2)

“Municipal water supply purpose” includes, but is not imited to, any of the following, separately or in any combination:

(A)

Construction or maintenance of a water intake structure;

(B)

Maintenance of a water intake source;

(C)

Research concerning a water intake source or structure; and

(D)

Other activity associated with a water intake source or structure; and

(3)

“Owner” means the possessor of a fee interest or a tenant, lessee, occupant, or person in control of the land.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.

18-11-603. Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to:

(1)

Create a duty of care or a basis for liability for injury to persons or property; or

(2)

Relieve any person using the land of another for a municipal water supply purpose from any obligation that he or she may have in the absence of this subchapter to exercise care in his or her use of the land and in his or her activities on the land or relieve any person from the legal consequences of failure to employ such care.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.

18-11-604. Duty of care.

Except as specifically provided in §18-11-607, an owner owes no duty of care to:

(1)

Keep his or her land safe for entry or use by another for a municipal water supply purpose; or

(2)

Give any warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on his or her land to a person entering for a municipal water supply purpose.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.

18-11-605. Owner's immunity from liability.

Except as specifically provided in §18-11-607, an owner who, either directly or indirectly, invites or permits any person to use his or her land for a municipal water supply purpose does not:

(1)

Extend any assurance that the land is safe for any purpose;

(2)

Confer upon the person the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed;

(3)

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or property caused by an act or omission of the person; or

(4)

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for injury to the person or property caused by any natural or artificial condition, structure, or personal property on the land.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.

18-11-606. Land leased to municipality.

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, the provisions of §§18-11-604 and18-11-605 shall be deemed the sole source of the duties and liability of an owner who leased or otherwise provided land to a municipality for a municipal water supply purpose.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.

18-11-607. Exceptions to owner's immunity.

Nothing in this subchapter limits in any way liability that otherwise exists for malicious, but not mere negligent, failure to guard or warn against an ultra-hazardous condition, structure, personal property, use, or activity actually known to the owner to be dangerous.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1977, § 1.